Utah statutes.
39-6-46.   Findings -- Background check prior to sentencing.
(1)  A court shall announce its findings and sentence to the parties as soon
as determined.
(2)  The court panel may defer sentencing pending an investigation of the
background of the accused to determine a just and appropriate sentence.
